Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 1 Establishment and General Provisions
69-5-138. Notice of hearing on establishment of district.

Publication in a newspaper published in the county where the petition is filed and proceeding is pending, for two (2) consecutive weeks, of the time and place set for the hearing of the petition to establish such district, shall be sufficient notice to the persons concerned as owners, lienholders, encumbrancers, mortgagees, occupants, or in any way, whether residents or nonresidents of the state, the last publication to be at least ten (10) days before the date set for such hearing. Such notice by publication shall have the same force and effect upon those concerned who are not petitioners, and who are residents of the state, as well as nonresidents, for all purposes of the proceeding, as process would have duly issued from the court and served personally upon them by an officer. Such publication notice need not give the names of the persons thus notified to appear, but need give only a brief statement of the purpose of the hearing, a reference to the petition on file for further information, as to the purpose of the proceeding, before what court the petition is to be heard, and the time and place of the hearing. If the proposed district is to embrace lands in more than one (1) county, if established, such publication shall be made in one (1) newspaper published in each of the counties.

Subsection (a) is not intended to repeal any portion of this chapter, and shall not be so construed, but is intended to furnish an additional method of proceeding to bring the parties concerned before the court in proceedings seeking to establish drainage, or drainage and levee, districts, and to give petitioners the option of whether they will proceed under such other provisions of this chapter or under subsection (a) in giving notice to the parties concerned of such hearing, and in bringing them before the court.

Acts 1915, ch. 62, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 3871a160, 3871a161; Code 1932, §§ 4396, 4397; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-745, 70-746; T.C.A. §69-6-138.

69-5-139. Petitioners' names may be signed by attorney or agent.

It shall be a sufficient signing, in the sense of this chapter, of the names of petitioners to the petitions provided for in this part, if their names are signed by their attorney at law or by an agent authorized so to do.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 35; Shan., § 3871a136; Code 1932, § 4371; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-747; T.C.A. §69-6-139.

69-5-140. Drainage record book.

In any county where a district is sought to be established, the county clerk shall provide a book to be known as the “drainage record,” to be paid for by the county, and the clerk shall keep in the drainage record book a full and complete record of all proceedings in each case arising under this chapter, including all orders made by the county court, and certified from the circuit court, and a copy of the original petition shall be enrolled in the drainage record, all bonds required to be given. All orders and judgments of the county court touching any matter of the district may be entered upon the drainage record book, without being entered upon the regular minute book, but it shall be sufficient if such orders or judgments are entered either upon the drainage record or the regular minute book of the court.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 15; 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 7; Shan., § 3871a74; Code 1932, § 4302; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-748; T.C.A. §69-6-140.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-141. Fees of clerk.

The fees of the county clerk in proceedings under this chapter shall be the same as for similar services now allowed by law, and in such case the county court may allow the clerk an additional sum for extra services, or services not covered by existing fee bills, or statutes, to be fixed by the court, and paid as other costs and expenses in the case or proceeding.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 16; Shan., § 3871a75; Code 1932, § 4303; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-749; T.C.A. §69-6-141.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Cross-References. County clerk fees, title 8, ch. 21, part 7.

69-5-142. Compensation fixed by county court.

If there are any services required of any person under this chapter, and the rate of pay for those services is not provided for by this chapter, then the county courts shall fix the amount or rate of pay in such cases.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 36; Shan., § 3871a143; Code 1932, § 4378; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-750; T.C.A. §69-6-142.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-143. Reelfoot Lake and Big Hatchie River excepted.

This chapter is not intended to apply to Reelfoot Lake or Big Hatchie River and the waters of such lake or river, or to authorize their draining, and this chapter shall not be construed in any way to authorize the draining of such lake or river or its bottom lands; provided, that dredge boats may be permitted to excavate as far north as, but no farther than, what is known as “Three Bridges” in the fifth civil district of Obion County and the fourth civil district of Lake County.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 40; 1915, ch. 53, § 1; Shan., § 3871a159; Acts 1921, ch. 60, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 4394; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-751; T.C.A. §69-6-143.

69-5-144. Authority to cooperate with other agencies.

Any drainage district or districts, in addition to the authority that it now has, shall also be authorized to cooperate and contract with persons, firms, associations, partnerships and private corporations, and with other watershed districts, drainage districts, conservation districts, levee districts, counties, cities, quasi- municipalities, utility districts, and other similar corporations or agencies of this state, and with any such districts or agencies organized for similar purposes in any adjoining state, and with other local, state, and federal agencies, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee department of agriculture, the department of environment and conservation, Tennessee Valley authority, corps of army engineers, the secretary of defense, United States department of agriculture, or any other federal agency; to enter into cooperative contracts and agreements with any such districts, corporations or agencies; and to exercise all the powers and receive all benefits relating to watershed districts prescribed in 83 P.L. 566, 68 Stat. 666, or any other act of congress.

Acts 1959, ch. 258, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, §§ 1, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-752; T.C.A. §69-6-144.

Compiler's Notes. 83 P.L. 566, 68 Stat. 666, referred to in this section, appears generally as 16 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.

69-5-145. Abolishment of drainage districts — Separate account for district funds.

Any drainage district created pursuant to this chapter may be abolished by resolution of the county legislative body at any time the district has completed the projects for which such district was created. Any funds of the district necessary to fund the obligations of the district, to maintain such projects or to pay any indebtedness incurred pursuant to this chapter or otherwise shall be placed in a separate account by the county and shall remain in such account until expended to pay such maintenance, obligations or indebtedness. Any other funds remaining in the accounts of the district shall be transferred to the county general fund to be appropriated by the county legislative body.

This section applies to all drainage districts created prior to or after April 22, 1997, pursuant to this chapter or any other public or private act.

Acts 1997, ch. 110, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. §69-6-145.